District of Columbia statutes.
41-133

Action to compel delivery of abandoned property.

If any person refuses to pay or deliver abandoned property to the Mayor as required under this chapter, the Mayor may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to compel such delivery.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 133, 27 DCR 5150
1981 Ed., § 42-233.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 24 of the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (1966 Act).